Colorado, session 2026A, HB1034.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 6-7.5-102, repeal (10),
(38), (47), and (62) as follows:
6-7.5-102. Definitions.
As used in this article 7.5, unless the context otherwise requires and
except as determined by rule pursuant to section 6-7.5-106 (1):
(10) "Check valve" means a component that is internal to a spray
sprinkler body and prevents system drainage during periods of
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

nonoperation.
(38) "Irrigation controller" means a standalone controller, an add-on
device, or a plug-in device that is used to operate an automatic irrigation
system such as a lawn sprinkler or drip irrigation system designed and
intended for nonagricultural purposes. "Irrigation controller" includes:
(a) A soil moisture-based irrigation controller that inhibits or allows
an irrigation event based on a reading from a soil moisture sensor
mechanism; and
(b) A weather-based irrigation controller that uses current weather
data as a basis for scheduling irrigation.
(47) "Pressure regulator" means a device that maintains constant
operating pressure immediately downstream from a spray sprinkler body,
given higher pressure upstream of the device.
(62) "Spray sprinkler body" means the exterior case or shell of a
sprinkler designed and intended for nonagricultural uses, which case or
shell:
(a) Incorporates a means of connection to the piping system; and
(b) Is designed to convey water to a nozzle or orifice.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 6-7.5-104, repeal
(1)(j.7) and (1)(n) as follows:
6-7.5-104. Scope and applicability.
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section and as further specified
in section 6-7.5-105, this article 7.5 applies to the following products sold
as new in Colorado:
(j.7) Irrigation controllers;
(n) Spray sprinkler bodies;
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 6-7.5-105, repeal
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1034

(5)(h) and (5)(k) as follows:
6-7.5-105. Standards - effective dates.
(5) On and after January 1, 2026, a person shall not sell, offer to sell,
lease, or offer to lease any of the following new products in Colorado unless
the efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the following efficiency
standards, as applicable:
(h) Irrigation controllers must comply with the following
requirements:
(I) Weather-based irrigation controllers included within the scope
of the WaterSense program product specification for weather-based
irrigation controllers must meet the water efficiency and performance
criteria and other requirements for that specification; and
(II) Soil moisture-based irrigation controllers included within the
scope of the WaterSense program product specification for soil
moisture-based irrigation controllers must meet the water efficiency and
performance criteria and other requirements for that specification.
(k) Spray sprinkler bodies that are not specifically excluded from the
scope of the WaterSense program product specification for spray sprinkler
bodies must include an integral pressure regulator and a check valve and
must meet the water efficiency and performance criteria and other
requirements of that specification.
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3)
of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section, or
part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will
not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election to be
held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1034

(2) This act applies to conduct occurring on or after the applicable
effective date of this act.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1034